Utah statutes.
62A-16-203.   Fatality Review Committees for a deceased resident of the Utah
State Hospital or the Utah State Developmental Center.
(1)  If a qualified individual who is the subject of a formal fatality review
that is ordered to be conducted under Subsection 62A-16-201(6), was a resident
of the Utah State Hospital or the Utah State Developmental Center, the
fatality review coordinator of that facility shall organize a fatality review
committee to review the fatality.
(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), a committee described in Subsection
(1) shall include the following members:
(a)  the fatality review coordinator for the facility, who shall serve as
chair of the committee;
(b)  a member of the management staff of the facility;
(c)  a supervisor of a unit other than the one in which the qualified
individual resided;
(d)  a physician;
(e)  a representative from the administration of the division that oversees
the facility;
(f)  the department's fatality review coordinator;
(g)  a member of the department's risk management services; and
(h)  a citizen who is not an employee of the department.
(3)  A committee described in Subsection (1) may also include a person whose
knowledge or expertise may significantly contribute to the formal review.
(4)  A committee described in this section may not include an individual who:
(a)  was involved in, or who supervises a person who was involved in, the
fatality; or
(b)  has a conflict with the fatality review.
